Illinois, session 104th, SB2446.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Child Care Act of 1969 is amended by 5changing Sections 4.1, 5, 5.01, 7.10 and 9.1c as follows: 6    (225 ILCS 10/4.1)  (from Ch. 23, par. 2214.1)7    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 103-594)8    Sec. 4.1. Criminal background investigations. The 9Department shall require that each child care facility license 10applicant as part of the application process, and each 11employee and volunteer of a child care facility or 12non-licensed service provider, as a condition of employment, 13authorize an investigation every 5 years, as required under 14the Child Care and Development Block Grant, to determine if 15such applicant, employee, or volunteer has ever been charged 16with a crime and if so, the disposition of those charges; this 17authorization shall indicate the scope of the inquiry and the 18agencies which may be contacted. Upon this authorization, the 19Director shall request and receive information and assistance 20from any federal, State or local governmental agency as part 21of the authorized investigation. Each applicant, employee, or 22volunteer of a child care facility or non-licensed service 23provider shall submit the applicant's, employee's, or   SB2446- 2 -LRB104 08655 AAS 18709 b1volunteer's fingerprints to the Illinois State Police in the 2form and manner prescribed by the Illinois State Police. These 3fingerprints shall be checked against the fingerprint records 4now and hereafter filed in the Illinois State Police and 5Federal Bureau of Investigation criminal history records 6databases. The Illinois State Police shall charge a fee for 7conducting the criminal history records check, which shall be 8deposited in the State Police Services Fund and shall not 9exceed the actual cost of the records check. The Illinois 10State Police shall provide information concerning any criminal 11charges, and their disposition, now or hereafter filed, 12against an applicant, employee, or volunteer of a child care 13facility or non-licensed service provider upon request of the 14Department of Children and Family Services when the request is 15made in the form and manner required by the Illinois State 16Police.17    Information concerning convictions of a license applicant, 18employee, or volunteer of a child care facility or 19non-licensed service provider investigated under this Section, 20including the source of the information and any conclusions or 21recommendations derived from the information, shall be 22provided, upon request, to such applicant, employee, or 23volunteer of a child care facility or non-licensed service 24provider prior to final action by the Department on the 25application. State conviction information provided by the 26Illinois State Police regarding employees, prospective   SB2446- 3 -LRB104 08655 AAS 18709 b1employees, or volunteers of non-licensed service providers and 2child care facilities licensed under this Act shall be 3provided to the operator of such facility, and, upon request, 4to the employee, prospective employee, or volunteer of a child 5care facility or non-licensed service provider. Any 6information concerning criminal charges and the disposition of 7such charges obtained by the Department shall be confidential 8and may not be transmitted outside the Department, except as 9required herein, and may not be transmitted to anyone within 10the Department except as needed for the purpose of evaluating 11an application or an employee or volunteer of a child care 12facility or non-licensed service provider. Only information 13and standards which bear a reasonable and rational relation to 14the performance of a child care facility shall be used by the 15Department or any licensee. Any employee of the Department of 16Children and Family Services, Illinois State Police, or a 17child care facility receiving confidential information under 18this Section who gives or causes to be given any confidential 19information concerning any criminal convictions of an 20applicant, employee, or volunteer of a child care facility or 21non-licensed service provider, shall be guilty of a Class A 22misdemeanor unless release of such information is authorized 23by this Section.24    The Department of Children and Family Services or the 25Department of Early Childhood shall allow day care centers, 26day care homes, and group day care homes to A child care   SB2446- 4 -LRB104 08655 AAS 18709 b1facility may hire, on a probationary basis, any employee or 2volunteer of a child care facility or non-licensed service 3provider authorizing a criminal background investigation under 4this Section, after completing either: pending the result of 5such investigation6        (1) the Federal Bureau of Investigation fingerprint 7    criminal background check; or8        (2) the Illinois State Police fingerprint criminal 9    background check and a criminal record check of the 10    criminal repository of each state in which the employee or 11    volunteer resided during the preceding 5 years.12    Pending completion of all background check requirements, 13the prospective employee or volunteer must be supervised at 14all times by an individual who received a qualifying result on 15all background check components. Employees and volunteers of a 16day care center, day care home, or group day care home child 17care facility or non-licensed service provider shall be 18notified prior to hiring that such employment may be 19terminated on the basis of criminal background information 20obtained by the facility.21    No later than July 1, 2026, the Department of Early 22Childhood shall establish a secure background check portal 23that is accessible, at minimum, to applicants, child care 24staff, human resources representatives, and day care licensing 25representatives and that has the following capabilities:26        (1) allows individuals to fill out all background   SB2446- 5 -LRB104 08655 AAS 18709 b1    check authorization forms online and upload and submit all 2    documents deemed necessary by the Department of Early 3    Childhood;4        (2) allows necessary parties to provide electronic 5    signatures on any background check documents;6        (3) allows individuals to check the status of the 7    background checks;8        (4) notifies the appropriate individual if information 9    or documents are missing;10        (5) includes a search feature that allows necessary 11    parties to view if an applicant's background check 12    clearance has been issued within the past 5 years or if the 13    background check has expired;14        (6) allows necessary parties to view and print any 15    background check clearance letters;16        (7) allows a background check clearance letter to be 17    tied to more than one license number; and18        (8) allows applicants to upload a background check 19    clearance letter, if the applicant has lived in another 20    state within the past 5 years, to satisfy the requirement 21    for an interstate background check.22        The Department of Early Childhood shall also publicize 23    a contact number for its background check unit that allows 24    interested parties to inquire about background checks.25(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 103-22, eff. 8-8-23.)   SB2446- 6 -LRB104 08655 AAS 18709 b1    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 103-594)2    Sec. 4.1. Criminal background investigations. The 3Department of Children and Family Services or the Department 4of Early Childhood shall require that each child care facility 5license applicant under the agencies' respective authority as 6part of the application process, and each employee and 7volunteer of a child care facility or non-licensed service 8provider, as a condition of employment, authorize an 9investigation every 5 years, as required under the Child Care 10and Development Block Grant, to determine if such applicant, 11employee, or volunteer has ever been charged with a crime and 12if so, the disposition of those charges; this authorization 13shall indicate the scope of the inquiry and the agencies which 14may be contacted. Upon this authorization, the Director shall 15request and receive information and assistance from any 16federal, State or local governmental agency as part of the 17authorized investigation. Each applicant, employee, or 18volunteer of a child care facility or non-licensed service 19provider shall submit the applicant's, employee's, or 20volunteer's fingerprints to the Illinois State Police in the 21form and manner prescribed by the Illinois State Police. These 22fingerprints shall be checked against the fingerprint records 23now and hereafter filed in the Illinois State Police and 24Federal Bureau of Investigation criminal history records 25databases. The Illinois State Police shall charge a fee for 26conducting the criminal history records check, which shall be   SB2446- 7 -LRB104 08655 AAS 18709 b1deposited in the State Police Services Fund and shall not 2exceed the actual cost of the records check. The Illinois 3State Police shall provide information concerning any criminal 4charges, and their disposition, now or hereafter filed, 5against an applicant, employee, or volunteer of a child care 6facility or non-licensed service provider upon request of the 7Department of Children and Family Services or the Department 8of Early Childhood when the request is made in the form and 9manner required by the Illinois State Police.10    Information concerning convictions of a license applicant, 11employee, or volunteer of a child care facility or 12non-licensed service provider investigated under this Section, 13including the source of the information and any conclusions or 14recommendations derived from the information, shall be 15provided, upon request, to such applicant, employee, or 16volunteer of a child care facility or non-licensed service 17provider prior to final action by the Department of Children 18and Family Services or the Department of Early Childhood under 19the agencies' respective authority on the application. State 20conviction information provided by the Illinois State Police 21regarding employees, prospective employees, or volunteers of 22non-licensed service providers and child care facilities 23licensed under this Act shall be provided to the operator of 24such facility, and, upon request, to the employee, prospective 25employee, or volunteer of a child care facility or 26non-licensed service provider. Any information concerning   SB2446- 8 -LRB104 08655 AAS 18709 b1criminal charges and the disposition of such charges obtained 2by the Department of Children and Family Services or the 3Department of Early Childhood shall be confidential and may 4not be transmitted outside the Department of Children and 5Family Services or the Department of Early Childhood, except 6as required herein, and may not be transmitted to anyone 7within the Department of Children and Family Services or the 8Department of Early Childhood except as needed for the purpose 9of evaluating an application or an employee or volunteer of a 10child care facility or non-licensed service provider. Only 11information and standards which bear a reasonable and rational 12relation to the performance of a child care facility shall be 13used by the Department of Children and Family Services or the 14Department of Early Childhood or any licensee. Any employee of 15the Department of Children and Family Services, Department of 16Early Childhood, Illinois State Police, or a child care 17facility receiving confidential information under this Section 18who gives or causes to be given any confidential information 19concerning any criminal convictions of an applicant, employee, 20or volunteer of a child care facility or non-licensed service 21provider, shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor unless 22release of such information is authorized by this Section.23    The Department of Children and Family Services or the 24Department of Early Childhood shall allow day care centers, 25day care homes, and group day care homes to A child care 26facility may hire, on a probationary basis, any employee or   SB2446- 9 -LRB104 08655 AAS 18709 b1volunteer of a child care facility or non-licensed service 2provider authorizing a criminal background investigation under 3this Section, after completing either: pending the result of 4such investigation5        (1) the Federal Bureau of Investigation fingerprint 6    criminal background check; or7        (2) the Illinois State Police fingerprint criminal 8    background check and a criminal record check of the 9    criminal repository of each state in which the employee or 10    volunteer resided during the preceding 5 years.11    Pending completion of all background check requirements, 12the prospective employee or volunteer must be supervised at 13all times by an individual who received a qualifying result on 14all background check components. Employees and volunteers of a 15day care center, day care home, or group day care home child 16care facility or non-licensed service provider shall be 17notified prior to hiring that such employment may be 18terminated on the basis of criminal background information 19obtained by the facility.20    No later than July 1, 2026, the Department of Early 21Childhood shall establish a secure background check portal 22that is accessible, at minimum, to applicants, child care 23staff, human resources representatives, and day care licensing 24representatives and that has the following capabilities:25        (1) allows individuals to fill out all background 26    check authorization forms online and upload and submit all   SB2446- 10 -LRB104 08655 AAS 18709 b1    documents deemed necessary by the Department of Early 2    Childhood;3        (2) allows necessary parties to provide electronic 4    signatures on any background check documents;5        (3) allows individuals to check the status of the 6    background checks;7        (4) notifies the appropriate individual if information 8    or documents are missing;9        (5) includes a search feature that allows necessary 10    parties to view if an applicant's background check 11    clearance has been issued within the past 5 years or if the 12    background check has expired;13        (6) allows necessary parties to view and print any 14    background check clearance letters;15        (7) allows a background check clearance letter to be 16    tied to more than one license number; and17        (8) allows applicants to upload a background check 18    clearance letter, if the applicant has lived in another 19    state within the past 5 years, to satisfy the requirement 20    for an interstate background check.21        The Department of Early Childhood shall also publicize 22    a contact number for its background check unit that allows 23    interested parties to inquire about background checks.24(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 103-22, eff. 8-8-23; 25103-594, eff. 7-1-26.)   SB2446- 11 -LRB104 08655 AAS 18709 b1    (225 ILCS 10/5)  (from Ch. 23, par. 2215)2    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 103-594)3    Sec. 5. (a) In respect to child care institutions, 4maternity centers, child welfare agencies, day care centers, 5day care agencies and group homes, the Department, upon 6receiving application filed in proper order, shall examine the 7facilities and persons responsible for care of children 8therein.9    (b) In respect to foster family and day care homes, 10applications may be filed on behalf of such homes by a licensed 11child welfare agency, by a State agency authorized to place 12children in foster care or by out-of-State agencies approved 13by the Department to place children in this State. In respect 14to day care homes, applications may be filed on behalf of such 15homes by a licensed day care agency or licensed child welfare 16agency. In applying for license in behalf of a home in which 17children are placed by and remain under supervision of the 18applicant agency, such agency shall certify that the home and 19persons responsible for care of unrelated children therein, or 20the home and relatives, as defined in Section 2.17 of this Act, 21responsible for the care of related children therein, were 22found to be in reasonable compliance with standards prescribed 23by the Department for the type of care indicated.24    (c) The Department shall not allow any person to examine 25facilities under a provision of this Act who has not passed an 26examination demonstrating that such person is familiar with   SB2446- 12 -LRB104 08655 AAS 18709 b1this Act and with the appropriate standards and regulations of 2the Department.3    (d) With the exception of day care centers, day care 4homes, and group day care homes, licenses shall be issued in 5such form and manner as prescribed by the Department and are 6valid for 4 years from the date issued, unless revoked by the 7Department or voluntarily surrendered by the licensee. 8Licenses issued for day care centers, day care homes, and 9group day care homes shall be valid for 5 years 3 years from 10the date issued, unless revoked by the Department or 11voluntarily surrendered by the licensee. When a licensee has 12made timely and sufficient application for the renewal of a 13license or a new license with reference to any activity of a 14continuing nature, the existing license shall continue in full 15force and effect for up to 30 days until the final agency 16decision on the application has been made. The Department may 17further extend the period in which such decision must be made 18in individual cases for up to 30 days, but such extensions 19shall be only upon good cause shown.20    (e) The Department may issue one 6-month permit to a newly 21established facility for child care to allow that facility 22reasonable time to become eligible for a full license. If the 23facility for child care is a foster family home, or day care 24home the Department may issue one 2-month permit only.25    (f) The Department may issue an emergency permit to a 26child care facility taking in children as a result of the   SB2446- 13 -LRB104 08655 AAS 18709 b1temporary closure for more than 2 weeks of a licensed child 2care facility due to a natural disaster. An emergency permit 3under this subsection shall be issued to a facility only if the 4persons providing child care services at the facility were 5employees of the temporarily closed day care center at the 6time it was closed. No investigation of an employee of a child 7care facility receiving an emergency permit under this 8subsection shall be required if that employee has previously 9been investigated at another child care facility. No emergency 10permit issued under this subsection shall be valid for more 11than 90 days after the date of issuance.12    (g) During the hours of operation of any licensed child 13care facility, authorized representatives of the Department 14may without notice visit the facility for the purpose of 15determining its continuing compliance with this Act or 16regulations adopted pursuant thereto.17    (h) Day care centers, day care homes, and group day care 18homes shall be monitored at least annually by a licensing 19representative from the Department or the agency that 20recommended licensure. 21    (i) Full monitoring and inspection reports, along with any 22corrective actions taken by the provider, shall be posted in 23plain language within 30 days after the creation of the report 24on the Department's consumer education website. 25(Source: P.A. 98-804, eff. 1-1-15.)   SB2446- 14 -LRB104 08655 AAS 18709 b1    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 103-594)2    Sec. 5. (a) This Section does not apply to any day care 3center, day care home, or group day care home. 4    In respect to child care institutions, maternity centers, 5child welfare agencies, and group homes, the Department, upon 6receiving application filed in proper order, shall examine the 7facilities and persons responsible for care of children 8therein.9    (b) In respect to foster family homes, applications may be 10filed on behalf of such homes by a licensed child welfare 11agency, by a State agency authorized to place children in 12foster care or by out-of-State agencies approved by the 13Department to place children in this State. In applying for 14license in behalf of a home in which children are placed by and 15remain under supervision of the applicant agency, such agency 16shall certify that the home and persons responsible for care 17of unrelated children therein, or the home and relatives, as 18defined in Section 2.17 of this Act, responsible for the care 19of related children therein, were found to be in reasonable 20compliance with standards prescribed by the Department for the 21type of care indicated.22    (c) The Department shall not allow any person to examine 23facilities under a provision of this Act who has not passed an 24examination demonstrating that such person is familiar with 25this Act and with the appropriate standards and regulations of 26the Department.  SB2446- 15 -LRB104 08655 AAS 18709 b1    (d) Licenses shall be issued in such form and manner as 2prescribed by the Department and are valid for 4 years from the 3date issued, unless revoked by the Department or voluntarily 4surrendered by the licensee. When a licensee has made timely 5and sufficient application for the renewal of a license or a 6new license with reference to any activity of a continuing 7nature, the existing license shall continue in full force and 8effect for up to 30 days until the final agency decision on the 9application has been made. The Department may further extend 10the period in which such decision must be made in individual 11cases for up to 30 days, but such extensions shall be only upon 12good cause shown.13    (e) The Department may issue one 6-month permit to a newly 14established facility for child care to allow that facility 15reasonable time to become eligible for a full license. If the 16facility for child care is a foster family home, the 17Department may issue one 2-month permit only.18    (f) The Department may issue an emergency permit to a 19child care facility taking in children as a result of the 20temporary closure for more than 2 weeks of a licensed child 21care facility due to a natural disaster. An emergency permit 22under this subsection shall be issued to a facility only if the 23persons providing child care services at the facility were 24employees of the temporarily closed facility at the time it 25was closed. No investigation of an employee of a child care 26facility receiving an emergency permit under this subsection   SB2446- 16 -LRB104 08655 AAS 18709 b1shall be required if that employee has previously been 2investigated at another child care facility. No emergency 3permit issued under this subsection shall be valid for more 4than 90 days after the date of issuance.5    (g) During the hours of operation of any licensed child 6care facility, authorized representatives of the Department 7may without notice visit the facility for the purpose of 8determining its continuing compliance with this Act or 9regulations adopted pursuant thereto.10    (h) (Blank).11(Source: P.A. 103-594, eff. 7-1-26.) 12    (225 ILCS 10/5.01)13    (This Section may contain text from a Public Act with a 14delayed effective date)15    Sec. 5.01. Licenses; permits; Department of Early 16Childhood. 17    (a) In respect to day care centers, the Department of 18Early Childhood, upon receiving application filed in proper 19order, shall examine the facilities and persons responsible 20for care of children therein.21    (b) In respect to day care homes, applications may be 22filed on behalf of such homes by the Department of Early 23Childhood.24    (c) The Department of Early Childhood shall not allow any 25person to examine facilities under a provision of this Act who   SB2446- 17 -LRB104 08655 AAS 18709 b1has not passed an examination demonstrating that such person 2is familiar with this Act and with the appropriate standards 3and regulations of the Department of Early Childhood.4    (d) Licenses issued for day care centers, day care homes, 5and group day care homes shall be valid for 5 years 3 years 6from the date issued, unless revoked by the Department of 7Early Childhood or voluntarily surrendered by the licensee. 8When a licensee has made timely and sufficient application for 9the renewal of a license or a new license with reference to any 10activity of a continuing nature, the existing license shall 11continue in full force and effect for up to 30 days until the 12final agency decision on the application has been made. The 13Department of Early Childhood may further extend the period in 14which such decision must be made in individual cases for up to 1530 days, but such extensions shall be only upon good cause 16shown.17    (e) The Department of Early Childhood may issue one 186-month permit to a newly established facility for child care 19to allow that facility reasonable time to become eligible for 20a full license. If the facility for child care is a day care 21home the Department of Early Childhood may issue one 2-month 22permit only.23    (f) The Department of Early Childhood may issue an 24emergency permit to a day care center taking in children as a 25result of the temporary closure for more than 2 weeks of a 26licensed child care facility due to a natural disaster. An   SB2446- 18 -LRB104 08655 AAS 18709 b1emergency permit under this subsection shall be issued to a 2facility only if the persons providing child care services at 3the facility were employees of the temporarily closed day care 4center at the time it was closed. No investigation of an 5employee of a child care facility receiving an emergency 6permit under this subsection shall be required if that 7employee has previously been investigated at another child 8care facility. No emergency permit issued under this 9subsection shall be valid for more than 90 days after the date 10of issuance.11    (g) During the hours of operation of any licensed day care 12center, day care home, or group day care home, authorized 13representatives of the Department of Early Childhood may 14without notice visit the facility for the purpose of 15determining its continuing compliance with this Act or rules 16adopted pursuant thereto.17    (h) Day care centers, day care homes, and group day care 18homes shall be monitored at least annually by a licensing 19representative from the Department of Early Childhood that 20recommended licensure. 21    (i) Full monitoring and inspection reports, along with any 22corrective actions taken by the provider, shall be posted in 23plain language within 30 days after the creation of the report 24on the Department of Early Childhood's consumer education 25website. 26(Source: P.A. 103-594, eff. 7-1-26; revised 10-21-24.)   SB2446- 19 -LRB104 08655 AAS 18709 b1    (225 ILCS 10/7.10)2    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 103-594)3    Sec. 7.10. Licensing orientation program and progress 4report. 5    (a) For the purposes of this Section, "child day care 6licensing" or "day care licensing" means licensing of day care 7centers, day care homes, and group day care homes. 8    (a-5) In addition to current day care daycare training and 9subject to appropriations, the Department or any State agency 10that assumes day care center licensing responsibilities shall 11host licensing orientation programs to help educate potential 12day care center, day care home, and group day care home 13providers about the child day care licensing process. The 14programs shall be made available in person and virtually. The 15Department or its successor shall offer to host licensing 16orientation programs at least twice annually in each 17Representative District in the State. Additionally, if one or 18more persons request that a program be offered in a language 19other than English, then the Department or its successor must 20accommodate the request. 21    (b) No later than September 30th of each year, the 22Department shall provide the General Assembly with a 23comprehensive report on its progress in meeting performance 24measures and goals related to child day care licensing.25    (c) The report shall include:  SB2446- 20 -LRB104 08655 AAS 18709 b1        (1) details on the funding for child day care 2    licensing, including:3            (A) the total number of full-time employees 4        working on child day care licensing;5            (B) the names of all sources of revenue used to 6        support child day care licensing;7            (C) the amount of expenditures that is claimed 8        against federal funding sources;9            (D) the identity of federal funding sources; and10            (E) how funds are appropriated, including 11        appropriations for line staff, support staff, 12        supervisory staff, and training and other expenses and 13        the funding history of such licensing since fiscal 14        year 2010;15        (2) current staffing qualifications of day care 16    licensing representatives and day care licensing 17    supervisors in comparison with staffing qualifications 18    specified in the job description;19        (3) data history for fiscal year 2010 to the current 20    fiscal year on day care licensing representative caseloads 21    and staffing levels in all areas of the State;22        (4) per the DCFS Child Day Care Licensing Advisory 23    Council's work plan, quarterly data on the following 24    measures:25            (A) the number and percentage of new applications 26        disposed of within 90 days;  SB2446- 21 -LRB104 08655 AAS 18709 b1            (B) the percentage of licenses renewed on time;2            (C) the percentage of day care centers receiving 3        timely annual monitoring visits;4            (D) the percentage of day care homes receiving 5        timely annual monitoring visits;6            (E) the percentage of group day care homes 7        receiving timely annual monitoring visits;8            (F) the percentage of provider requests for 9        supervisory review; 10            (G) the progress on adopting a key indicator 11        system;12            (H) the percentage of complaints disposed of 13        within 30 days;14            (I) the average number of days a day care center 15        applicant must wait to attend a licensing orientation;16            (J) the number of licensing orientation sessions 17        available per region in the past year; and18            (K) the number of Department trainings related to 19        licensing and child development available to providers 20        in the past year; and21        (5) efforts to coordinate with the Department of Human 22    Services and the State Board of Education on professional 23    development, credentialing issues, and child developers, 24    including training registry, child developers, and Quality 25    Rating and Improvement Systems (QRIS); and .26        (6) details regarding the processing of background   SB2446- 22 -LRB104 08655 AAS 18709 b1    checks, including the average number of days it takes for 2    the background check unit to complete a series of 3    background checks and issue a background check clearance 4    required under the Child Care and Development Block Grant. 5    (d) The Department shall work with the Governor's 6appointed Early Learning Council on issues related to and 7concerning child day care.8(Source: P.A. 103-805, eff. 1-1-25; revised 10-10-24.) 9    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 103-594)10    Sec. 7.10. Licensing orientation program and progress 11report. 12    (a) For the purposes of this Section, "child day care 13licensing" or "day care licensing" means licensing of day care 14centers, day care homes, and group day care homes. 15    (a-5) In addition to current day care daycare training and 16subject to appropriations, the Department or any State agency 17that assumes day care center licensing responsibilities shall 18host licensing orientation programs to help educate potential 19day care center, day care home, and group day care home 20providers about the child day care licensing process. The 21programs shall be made available in person and virtually. The 22Department or its successor shall offer to host licensing 23orientation programs at least twice annually in each 24Representative District in the State. Additionally, if one or 25more persons request that a program be offered in a language   SB2446- 23 -LRB104 08655 AAS 18709 b1other than English, then the Department or its successor must 2accommodate the request. 3    (b) No later than September 30th of each year, the 4Department of Early Childhood shall provide the General 5Assembly with a comprehensive report on its progress in 6meeting performance measures and goals related to child day 7care licensing.8    (c) The report shall include:9        (1) details on the funding for child day care 10    licensing, including:11            (A) the total number of full-time employees 12        working on child day care licensing;13            (B) the names of all sources of revenue used to 14        support child day care licensing;15            (C) the amount of expenditures that is claimed 16        against federal funding sources;17            (D) the identity of federal funding sources; and18            (E) how funds are appropriated, including 19        appropriations for line staff, support staff, 20        supervisory staff, and training and other expenses and 21        the funding history of such licensing since fiscal 22        year 2010;23        (2) current staffing qualifications of day care 24    licensing representatives and day care licensing 25    supervisors in comparison with staffing qualifications 26    specified in the job description;  SB2446- 24 -LRB104 08655 AAS 18709 b1        (3) data history for fiscal year 2010 to the current 2    fiscal year on day care licensing representative caseloads 3    and staffing levels in all areas of the State;4        (4) per the DCFS Child Day Care Licensing Advisory 5    Council's work plan, quarterly data on the following 6    measures:7            (A) the number and percentage of new applications 8        disposed of within 90 days;9            (B) the percentage of licenses renewed on time;10            (C) the percentage of day care centers receiving 11        timely annual monitoring visits;12            (D) the percentage of day care homes receiving 13        timely annual monitoring visits;14            (E) the percentage of group day care homes 15        receiving timely annual monitoring visits;16            (F) the percentage of provider requests for 17        supervisory review; 18            (G) the progress on adopting a key indicator 19        system;20            (H) the percentage of complaints disposed of 21        within 30 days;22            (I) the average number of days a day care center 23        applicant must wait to attend a licensing orientation;24            (J) the number of licensing orientation sessions 25        available per region in the past year; and26            (K) the number of Department of Early Childhood   SB2446- 25 -LRB104 08655 AAS 18709 b1        trainings related to licensing and child development 2        available to providers in the past year; and3        (5) efforts to coordinate with the Department of Human 4    Services and the State Board of Education on professional 5    development, credentialing issues, and child developers, 6    including training registry, child developers, and Quality 7    Rating and Improvement Systems (QRIS); and .8        (6) details regarding the processing of background 9    checks, including the average number of days it takes for 10    the background check unit to complete a series of 11    background checks and issue a background check clearance 12    required under the Child Care and Development Block Grant. 13    (d) The Department of Early Childhood shall work with the 14Governor's appointed Early Learning Council on issues related 15to and concerning child day care.16(Source: P.A. 103-594, eff. 7-1-26; 103-805, eff. 1-1-25; 17revised 11-26-24.) 18    (225 ILCS 10/9.1c)19    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 103-594)20    Sec. 9.1c. Public database of day care homes, group day 21care homes, and day care centers; license status.     No later 22than July 1, 2018, the Department shall establish and maintain 23on its official website a searchable database, freely 24accessible to the public, that provides the following 25information on each day care home, group day care home, and day   SB2446- 26 -LRB104 08655 AAS 18709 b1care center licensed by the Department: whether, within the 2past 5 years, the day care home, group day care home, or day 3care center has had its license revoked by or surrendered to 4the Department during a child abuse or neglect investigation 5or its application for a renewal of its license was denied by 6the Department, and, if so, the dates upon which the license 7was revoked by or surrendered to the Department or the 8application for a renewal of the license was denied by the 9Department. The Department may adopt any rules necessary to 10implement this Section. Nothing in this Section shall be 11construed to allow or authorize the Department to release or 12disclose any information that is prohibited from public 13disclosure under this Act or under any other State or federal 14law.15(Source: P.A. 100-52, eff. 1-1-18.) 16    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 103-594)17    Sec. 9.1c. Public consumer education website database of 18day care homes, group day care homes, and day care centers; 19license status. By July 1, 2026, the The Department of Early 20Childhood shall establish and maintain on its official 21consumer education website the following information, which 22shall be freely accessible to day care homes, group day care 23homes, and day care centers licensed by the Department, 24parents, providers, and the public: 25    (a) A a searchable database, freely accessible to the   SB2446- 27 -LRB104 08655 AAS 18709 b1public, that provides the following information on each day 2care home, group day care home, and day care center licensed by 3the Department of Early Childhood: whether, within the past 5 4years, the day care home, group day care home, or day care 5center has had its license revoked by or surrendered to the 6Department of Children and Family Services or the Department 7of Early Childhood during a child abuse or neglect 8investigation or its application for a renewal of its license 9was denied by the Department of Children and Family Services 10or the Department of Early Childhood, and, if so, the dates 11upon which the license was revoked by or surrendered to the 12Department of Children and Family Services or the Department 13of Early Childhood or the application for a renewal of the 14license was denied by the Department of Children and Family 15Services or the Department of Early Childhood. 16    (b) A central repository for the initial licensing 17application materials and renewal forms, as well as any other 18licensing information, including, but not limited to, 19guidance, rules, policy, standards, and statutes. The website 20must be updated immediately upon any changes to licensing 21guidance, rules, policy, or statute and valid weblinks must be 22provided. All materials and changes to licensing guidance, 23rules, policy, or statute shall be translated into additional 24languages, including, but not limited to, Spanish, Polish, and 25Arabic.26    (c) Forum, town hall, and public meeting information shall   SB2446- 28 -LRB104 08655 AAS 18709 b1be on the Department's official consumer education website in, 2at minimum, 14 days in advance of the forum, town hall, or 3public meeting. The Department shall host statewide virtual 4forums or town halls on, at minimum, a quarterly basis, with 5the purpose of updating day care providers on changes to 6licensing policies and procedures and allowing day care 7providers to ask questions. If one or more persons request 8that a forum or town hall be offered in a language other than 9English, then the Department shall accommodate the request.10    (d) If the Department submits proposed or emergency 11rulemaking to the Joint Committee on Administrative Rules, the 12Department shall hold, at minimum, 2 statewide virtual forums 13or town halls to explain the rulemaking changes, gather 14feedback, and inform the public of the process to submit 15written comments. The forums or town halls shall be held 16within 2 weeks of the rulemaking's publication in the Illinois 17Register. If one or more persons request that a forum or town 18hall be offered in a language other than English, then the 19Department shall accommodate the request. 20    The Department of Early Childhood may adopt any rules 21necessary to implement this Section. Nothing in this Section 22shall be construed to allow or authorize the Department of 23Early Childhood to release or disclose any information that is 24prohibited from public disclosure under this Act or under any 25other State or federal law.26(Source: P.A. 103-594, eff. 7-1-26.)   SB2446- 29 -LRB104 08655 AAS 18709 b1    Section 10. The Missing Children Records Act is amended by 2changing Section 5 as follows: 3    (325 ILCS 50/5)  (from Ch. 23, par. 2285)4    Sec. 5. Duties of school or other entity. 5    (a) Upon notification by the Illinois State Police of a 6person's disappearance, a school, preschool educational 7program, child care facility, or day care home or group day 8care home in which the person is currently or was previously 9enrolled shall flag the record of that person in such a manner 10that whenever a copy of or information regarding the record is 11requested, the school or other entity shall be alerted to the 12fact that the record is that of a missing person. The school or 13other entity shall immediately report to the Illinois State 14Police any request concerning flagged records or knowledge as 15to the whereabouts of any missing person. Upon notification by 16the Illinois State Police that the missing person has been 17recovered, the school or other entity shall remove the flag 18from the person's record.19    (b) (1) For every child enrolled in a particular 20elementary or secondary school, public or private preschool 21educational program, public or private child care facility 22licensed under the Child Care Act of 1969, or day care home or 23group day care home licensed under the Child Care Act of 1969, 24that school or other entity shall notify in writing the person   SB2446- 30 -LRB104 08655 AAS 18709 b1enrolling the child that within 30 days he must provide either 2(i) a certified copy of the child's birth certificate or (ii) 3other reliable proof, as determined by the Illinois State 4Police, of the child's identity and age and an affidavit 5explaining the inability to produce a copy of the birth 6certificate. Other reliable proof of the child's identity and 7age shall include a passport, visa or other governmental 8documentation of the child's identity. By September 30, 2025, 9the Illinois State Police shall publish a list of acceptable 10governmental documentation that provides satisfactory proof of 11the child's identity and age. A grace period of up to 90 12calendar days after the first date of attendance should be 13allowed for the person enrolling the child to provide any 14other reliable documentation that has been identified. When 15the person enrolling the child provides the school or other 16entity with a certified copy of the child's birth certificate 17or other reliable documentation of the child's identity and 18age, the school or other entity shall promptly make a copy of 19the certified copy or other reliable documentation for its 20records and return the original certified copy or other 21reliable documentation to the person enrolling the child. Once 22a school or other entity has been provided with a certified 23copy of a child's birth certificate as required under item (i) 24of this subdivision (b)(1), the school or other entity need 25not request another such certified copy with respect to that 26child for any other year in which the child is enrolled in that   SB2446- 31 -LRB104 08655 AAS 18709 b1school or other entity. 2    (2) Upon the failure of a person enrolling a child to 3comply with subsection (b) (1), the school or other entity 4shall immediately notify the Illinois State Police or local 5law enforcement agency of such failure, and shall notify the 6person enrolling the child in writing that he has 10 7additional days to comply.8    (3) The school or other entity shall immediately report to 9the Illinois State Police any affidavit received pursuant to 10this subsection which appears inaccurate or suspicious in form 11or content.12    (c) Within 14 days after enrolling a transfer student, the 13elementary or secondary school shall request directly from the 14student's previous school a certified copy of his record. The 15requesting school shall exercise due diligence in obtaining 16the copy of the record requested. Any elementary or secondary 17school requested to forward a copy of a transferring student's 18record to the new school shall comply within 10 days of receipt 19of the request unless the record has been flagged pursuant to 20subsection (a), in which case the copy shall not be forwarded 21and the requested school shall notify the Illinois State 22Police or local law enforcement authority of the request.23(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.) 24    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 25changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text   SB2446- 32 -LRB104 08655 AAS 18709 b1that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 2represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 3not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 4made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 5Public Act.